Washington statutes.
RCW 43.105.060

Contracts by state and local agencies with agency.

State and local government agencies are authorized to enter into any contracts with the agency which may be necessary or desirable to effectuate the purposes and policies of this chapter or for maximum utilization of facilities and services which are the subject of this chapter.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 808; 1987 c 504 s 10; 1973 1st ex.s. c 219 s 9; 1967 ex.s. c 115 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective date—1967 ex.s. c 115: See note following RCW 43.105.020.